Utah statutes.
78B-6-1226.   Security for payment.

The referees may take separate mortgages and other securities;

(1)  for the whole or convenient portions of the purchase money;

(2)  on any part of the property directed by the court to be sold on credit;

(3)  for the shares of any known owner of full age, in the name of the owner;

(4)  for the shares of a minor, in the name of the guardian of the minor; and

(5)  for other shares, in the name of the clerk of the court and his successors in office.

